Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-671.01
Partial payments, authorized; interest; rate; warrants; issuance; payment.

For the purpose of making partial payments as the work progresses, warrants may be issued by the mayor and city council upon certificates of the engineer in charge showing the amount of work completed and materials necessarily purchased and delivered for the orderly and proper continuation of the project in a total amount not to exceed ninety-five percent of the cost thereof and upon the completion and acceptance of the work issue a final warrant for the balance of the amount due the contractor. The city shall pay to the contractor interest at the rate of eight percent per annum on the amounts due on partial and final payments beginning forty-five days after the certification of the amounts due by the engineer in charge and approval of the governing body, and running until the date that the warrant is tendered to the contractor. The warrants shall be redeemed and paid out of the proceeds received from the special assessments levied under the provisions of section 16-669, or out of the proceeds of the bonds or warrants issued under the provisions of sections 16-670 and 16-671. The warrants shall draw such interest as shall be provided in the warrants from the date of registration until paid.

Laws 1955, c. 34, § 1, p. 142;

Laws 1969, c. 51, § 34, p. 293;

Laws 1974, LB 636, § 2.